Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-107
Interest; effect on purchase of certain lands.

The rate of interest fixed by sections 45-101.02 to 45-106 shall not affect interest on purchase money of school, university, and agricultural college lands, or on lands delinquent or sold for the nonpayment of taxes.

Laws 1879, § 11, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 3356;

C.S.1922, § 2844;

C.S.1929, § 45-111;

R.S.1943, § 45-107.

For provisions for payment of interest on redemption from sale for taxes, see sections 77-1824 and 77-1830.